Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [471.3458] VOLUNTEER EMERGENCY SERVICES PROVIDERS; TIRE PURCHASES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Fire department" has the meaning given in section 299N.01, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (c) "Municipality" means a statutory or home rule charter city or a town. new text end new text begin (d) "Volunteer emergency services provider" means a volunteer firefighter, as defined in section 299N.03, subdivision 7; volunteer ambulance attendant, as defined in section 144E.001, subdivision 15; volunteer paramedic; or any other volunteer emergency medical personnel performing emergency medical services for a municipality or fire department. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Tire purchases. new text end new text begin A municipality or fire department may authorize a volunteer emergency services provider who has performed services for the municipality or fire department for at least three years and who is currently performing services for the municipality or fire department to purchase up to four vehicle tires for one personal vehicle owned by the volunteer emergency services provider every three years under a contract for tires from which the municipality or fire department purchases vehicle tires. The volunteer emergency services provider must pay for any tires purchased under this section, including all applicable taxes and fees. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Authorization requirements. new text end new text begin (a) The authorization by a municipality or fire department to purchase tires under this section must be in writing on the municipality's or fire department's letterhead and include the following: new text end new text begin (1) the volunteer emergency services provider's name; new text end new text begin (2) the number of years the volunteer emergency services provider has performed services for the municipality or fire department; new text end new text begin (3) the license plate number of the personal vehicle on which the tires will be placed; and new text end new text begin (4) a reference to the contract under which the municipality or fire department purchases vehicle tires. new text end new text begin (b) The municipality or fire department must document how many tires each volunteer emergency services provider purchases during the periods specified in this section. new text end